test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UNG_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     k̲'usägúng+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲'usägúng
     k̲'usägúng+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúngga
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng
     k̲'usägúng+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúnggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúnggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúngs
     k̲'usägúng+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúngang
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúngganggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúnggangang
     k̲'usägúng+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggaangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'usägúngäsaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'usägúngäs
     k̲'usägúng+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngäsaang
     k̲'usägúng+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngäsga
     k̲'usägúng+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngäsaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúngäsaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asa'áa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asa'áang
     k̲'usägúng+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲'usägúng+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'uuj
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'usägúngäsaa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ujaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'uujaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngäsaa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'usägúngäseehl
     k̲'usägúng+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲'usägúng'uu
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'wägan
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aawaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aawaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'waas
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'usägúng'aawaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'aawaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang'waang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúnggang'waa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'wägiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'wägaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'wägaangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'usägúng'waaäs
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsga
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa'uuj
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'waa'ujaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'usägúng'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'waa'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'usägúng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲'usägúng'waa'ahl
     k̲'usägúng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'usägúng'waaäseehl
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'angga
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'anggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'anggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ans
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'usägúng'aangaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'angang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'aangaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'anggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang'anggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúnggang'angang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'anggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'anggaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'anggaangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'usägúng'angäsaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'usägúng'angäs
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'angäsaang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'angäsga
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'angäsaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'angäsaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúngang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'uuj
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'usägúng'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'ujaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'angäsaa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'aang'ahlans
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲'usägúng'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲'usägúng'aang'ahl
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲'usägúng'angäseehl
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'uu
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'wägan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waas
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang'ang'waa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúnggang'ang'waang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúnggang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'wägiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäs
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsga
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲'usägúng'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲'usägúng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲'usägúng'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
